Utah statutes.
53A-11-801.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Child" or "minor child" means a person:

(a)  under the age of 18; or

(b)  under the age of 23 who is receiving educational services as an individual with a disability.

(2)  "Corporal punishment" means the intentional infliction of physical pain upon the body of a minor child as a disciplinary measure.

(3)  "School" means any public or private elementary or secondary school, pre-school, care center, nursery school, or business which receives compensation for supervising or educating a child.

